Washington statutes.
RCW 36.102.801

Legislation as opportunity for voter's decision—Not indication of legislators' personal vote on referendum proposal—1997 c 220.

The legislature neither affirms nor refutes the value of this proposal, and by this legislation [act] simply expresses its intent to provide the voter of the state of Washington an opportunity to express the voter's decision. It is also expressed that many legislators might personally vote against this proposal at the polls, or they might not.

[ 1997 c 220 s 605 (Referendum Bill No. 48, approved June 17, 1997).]